src/fst/stems/verbs.lexc
!! Verbs
!  -----
!! Verbs in the Sahaptin Tenino language inflect for tense.

LEXICON Verbs
auna+V+Aux:áuna # "let's/" ;
awa+V:áwa TAMs "exist, have/" ;
awalptaikawasha+V:awalptaikáwa TAMs "sing/" ;
awititamasha+V:awititámasha TAMs "count/" ;
ititamasha+V:ititáma TAMs "count/" ;
inatii+V:inatii TAMs "bloom, get ripe/" ;
itʼtʼauwaxn+V:itʼtʼauwaxn TAMs "grow/" ;
payaxta+V:payaxtá TAMs "pour/" ;!checkme
shapalaqaixisha+V:shapalaqáixi TAMs "turn on the lights/" ;
shapalaqaixisha+V+Imprt+ScSg2:ashapalaqáixik # "turn on the lights/" ;
shapatʼshksha+V:shapatʼshk TAMs "turn out/" ;
shapatʼshksha+V+Imprt+ScSg2:ashapatʼshknk # "turn out/" ;
shaputʼshksha+V:shapútʼshk TAMs "blow out/" ;
shaputʼshksha+V+Imprt+ScSg2:ashapútʼshknk # "blow out/" ;
tkwatasha+V:tkwata TAMs "eat/" ;
wa+V:wa TAMs "be (Copula)/" ;
wa+V+Ind+Prs+ScSg1:aswa # "be (Copula)/" ;


verb    Persons   ;

! vim: set ft=xfst-lexc:
